src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Num-njolj_gt-norm.yaml
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: нёльнанъяссьыныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: нёльнанъясаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: нёльнанъясныслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: нёльнанъясныссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: нёльнанъясӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: нёльнанъясӧдзныс
